District of Columbia statutes.
41-119

Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

(a)

Except for property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository, upon filing a report required by § 41-117, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall pay, deliver, or cause to be paid or delivered to the Mayor the property described in the report as unclaimed, but if the property is an automatically renewable deposit, and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result, the time for compliance is extended until a penalty or forfeiture would no longer result. Tangible property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository shall not be delivered to the Mayor until 120 days after filing the report required in § 41-117.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

The holder of an interest under § 41-109 shall deliver a duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership to the Mayor if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the Mayor, the holder and any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with the provisions of § 41-120 to every person, including any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate delivered to the Mayor, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the issuance and delivery to the Mayor of the duplicate certificate.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 119, 27 DCR 5150
June 11, 1981, D.C. Law 4-10, § 2(c), 28 DCR 1989
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-161, § 2(o), 39 DCR 5696
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1701(n), 44 DCR 7378
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 19 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1701(n) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1701(n) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 1701(n) of D.C. Law 12-59 rewrote (a); and repealed (b) and (c).
1981 Ed., § 42-219.
This section is referenced in § 41-106 and § 41-137.